Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF126.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1707YH (1) 91 as/js H.F. 126 Section 1. Section 124.401, subsection 1, paragraph a, 1 subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (b), Code 2025, is 2 amended to read as follows: 3 (b) Cocaine, its salts, optical and geometric isomers, or 4 salts of isomers , or cocaine base . 5 Sec. 2. Section 124.401, subsection 1, paragraph a, 6 subparagraph (3), Code 2025, is amended by striking the 7 subparagraph. 8 Sec. 3. Section 124.401, subsection 1, paragraph b, 9 subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (b), Code 2025, is 10 amended to read as follows: 11 (b) Cocaine, its salts, optical and geometric isomers, or 12 salts of isomers , or cocaine base . 13 Sec. 4. Section 124.401, subsection 1, paragraph b, 14 subparagraph (3), Code 2025, is amended by striking the 15 subparagraph. 16 Sec. 5. Section 124.401, subsection 1, paragraph c, 17 subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (b), Code 2025, is 18 amended to read as follows: 19 (b) Cocaine, its salts, optical and geometric isomers, or 20 salts of isomers , or cocaine base . 21 Sec. 6. Section 124.401, subsection 1, paragraph c, 22 subparagraph (3), Code 2025, is amended by striking the 23 subparagraph. 24 Sec. 7. Section 232.22, subsection 1, paragraph e, Code 25 2025, is amended to read as follows: 26 e. There is probable cause to believe that the child has 27 committed a delinquent act involving possession with intent to 28 deliver any of the following controlled substances: 29 (1) A mixture or substance containing cocaine base, also 30 known as crack cocaine, and if the act was committed by an 31 adult, it would be a violation of section 124.401, subsection 32 1 , paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (3), paragraph âbâ , subparagraph 33 (3), or paragraph âcâ , subparagraph (3). 34 (2) (1) A mixture or substance containing cocaine, its 35 -1- LSB 1707YH (1) 91 as/js 1/ 3 H.F. 126 salts, optical and geometric isomers, and or salts of isomers , 1 or cocaine base , and if the act was committed by an adult, 2 it would be a violation of section 124.401, subsection 1 , 3 paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (b), 4 paragraph âbâ , subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (b), or 5 paragraph âcâ , subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (b). 6 (3) (2) A mixture or substance containing methamphetamine, 7 its salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, or analogs of 8 methamphetamine, and if the act was committed by an adult, it 9 would be a violation of section 124.401, subsection 1 . 10